test/src/gt-desc-yamls/N-ciaha_gt-norm.yaml
Config:
  hfst:
    Gen: ../../../src/generator-gt-norm.hfst
    Morph: ../../../src/analyser-gt-norm.hfst
  xerox:
    Gen: ../../../src/generator-gt-norm.xfst
    Morph: ../../../src/analyser-gt-norm.xfst
    App: lookup

Tests:


  Noun - čiähá: # á-stems
    čiähá+N+Sg+Nom: čiäHá
    čiähá+N+Sg+Gen: čiäVá
    čiähá+N+Sg+Ill: čiäHán
    čiähá+N+Sg+Loc: čiäVást
    čiähá+N+Sg+Com: čiävváin
    čiähá+N+Ess: čiähhán
    čiähá+N+Par: čiähhád
    čiähá+N+Pl+Nom: čiäVáh
    čiähá+N+Pl+Gen: čiäVái
    čiähá+N+Pl+Acc: čiäVáid
    čiähá+N+Pl+Ill: čiävváid
    čiähá+N+Pl+Loc: čiäVáin
    čiähá+N+Pl+Com: čiä'Váiguin
    čiähá+N+Pl+Abe: čiä'Váittáá
